Maryland, session 2025, HB0057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING
THE SCHOOL DAY, EXCEPT A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.
(B) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO
LIMIT THE USE OF CELLULAR PHONES BY STUDENTS DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE
POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0057*

HOUSE BILL 57
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE DURING
INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S CELLULAR
PHONE IN A SECURE PLACE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, INCLUDING:
(I) A LOCKER;
(II) A CLOSED BACKPACK; OR
(III) A STORAGE CONTAINER PROVIDED BY THE SCHOOL.
(D) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED HEALTH
ISSUE; OR
(3) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(E) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE
APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.